Washington statutes.
RCW 32.20.253

Loans secured by real estate, mobile homes, movable buildings.

A mutual savings bank may invest its funds in loans secured by real estate or on the security of mobile homes or other movable buildings or any interest or estate in any of the foregoing. Such loans may be on such terms and conditions and subject to such limitations and restrictions as the board of trustees shall from time to time establish.

[ 1981 c 86 s 14.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 86: See note following RCW 32.08.140.